Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201981-5,168
State boiler inspector; inspection; exception; contract with authorized inspection agency; certification.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the state boiler inspector shall inspect or cause to be inspected at least once every twelve months all boilers required to be inspected by the Boiler Inspection Act to determine whether the boilers are in a safe and satisfactory condition and properly constructed and maintained for the purpose for which the boiler is used, except that (a) hobby boilers, steam farm traction engines, portable and stationary show engines, and portable and stationary show boilers, which are not otherwise exempted from the act pursuant to section 81-5,172, shall be subject to inspection at least once every twenty-four months and (b) the State Fire Marshal may, by rule and regulation, establish inspection periods for pressure vessels of more than twelve months, but not to exceed the inspection period recommended in the National Board Inspection Code or the American Petroleum Institute Pressure Vessel Inspection Code API-510 for pressure vessels being used for similar purposes. In order to ensure that inspections are performed in a timely manner, the State Fire Marshal may contract with an authorized inspection agency to perform any inspection authorized under the Boiler Inspection Act. If the State Fire Marshal contracts with an authorized inspection agency to perform inspections, such contract shall be in writing and shall contain an indemnification clause wherein the authorized inspection agency agrees to indemnify and defend the State Fire Marshal for loss occasioned by negligent or tortious acts committed by special inspectors employed by such authorized inspection agency when performing inspections on behalf of the State Fire Marshal.

(2) No boilers required to be inspected by the act shall be operated without valid and current certification pursuant to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the State Fire Marshal in accordance with the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act. The owner of any boiler installed after September 2, 1973, shall file a manufacturer's data report covering the construction of such boiler with the state boiler inspector. Such reports shall be used to assist the state boiler inspector in the certification of boilers. No boiler required to be inspected by the Boiler Inspection Act shall be operated at any type of public gathering or show without first being inspected and certified as to its safety by the state boiler inspector or a special inspector commissioned pursuant to section 81-5,177. Antique engines with boilers may be brought into the state from other states without inspection, but inspection as provided in this section shall be made and the boiler certified as safe before being operated.

(3) The State Fire Marshal may, by rule and regulation, waive the inspection of unfired pressure vessels registered with the State of Nebraska if the State Fire Marshal finds that the owner or user of the unfired pressure vessel follows a safety inspection and repair program that is based upon nationally recognized standards.

(4) A boiler that is used as a water heater to supply potable hot water and that is not otherwise exempt from inspection under the act pursuant to section 81-5,172 shall be subject to inspection at least once every twenty-four months in accordance with a schedule of inspection established by the State Fire Marshal by rule and regulation.

Laws 1943, c. 112, § 2(1), p. 392;

R.S.1943, § 48-702;

Laws 1961, c. 235, § 5, p. 698;

Laws 1971, LB 886, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 481, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 48-702;

Laws 1987, LB 462, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 438, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 641, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 395, § 13;

Laws 1999, LB 66, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB226, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB627, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-722;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 4.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.